Nebraska, session 109, LB846.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB846 LB846
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2716.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2716.01 (1)(a) Through tax year 2017, every individual shall be
allowed to subtract from his or her income tax liability an amount for
personal exemptions. The amount allowed to be subtracted shall be the
credit amount for the year as provided in this subdivision multiplied by
the number of exemptions allowed on the federal return. For tax year
1993, the credit amount shall be sixty-five dollars; for tax year 1994,
the credit amount shall be sixty-nine dollars; for tax year 1995, the
credit amount shall be sixty-nine dollars; for tax year 1996, the credit
amount shall be seventy-two dollars; for tax year 1997, the credit amount
shall be eighty-six dollars; for tax year 1998, the credit amount shall
be eighty-eight dollars; for tax year 1999, and each year thereafter
through tax year 2017, the credit amount shall be adjusted for inflation
by the method provided in section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as it existed prior to December 22, 2017. The eighty-eight-dollar
credit amount shall be adjusted for cumulative inflation since 1998. If
any credit amount is not an even dollar amount, the amount shall be
rounded to the nearest dollar. For nonresident individuals and partial-
year resident individuals, the personal exemption credit shall be
subtracted as specified in subsection (3) of section 77-2715.
(b) Beginning with tax year 2018, every individual, except an
individual that can be claimed for a child credit or dependent credit on
the federal return of another taxpayer, shall be allowed to subtract from
his or her income tax liability an amount for personal exemptions. The
amount allowed to be subtracted shall be the credit amount for the year
as provided in this subdivision multiplied by the sum of the number of
child credits and dependent credits taken on the federal return, plus two
for a married filing jointly return or plus one for any other return. For
tax year 2018, the credit amount shall be one hundred thirty-four
dollars. For tax year 2019 and each tax year thereafter, the credit
-2-

LB846 LB846
2026 2026
amount shall be adjusted for inflation based on the percentage change in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the federal
Bureau of Labor Statistics from the twelve months ending on August 31,
2017, to the twelve months ending on August 31 of the year preceding the
taxable year. If any credit amount is not an even dollar amount, the
amount shall be rounded to the nearest dollar. For nonresident
individuals and partial-year resident individuals, the personal exemption
credit shall be subtracted as specified in subsection (3) of section
77-2715.
(2)(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2004, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, every individual who did not itemize deductions
on his or her federal return shall be allowed to subtract from federal
adjusted gross income a standard deduction based on the filing status
used on the federal return except as the amount is adjusted under section
77-2716.03. The standard deduction shall be the smaller of the federal
standard deduction actually allowed or (i) for single taxpayers four
thousand seven hundred fifty dollars, (ii) for head of household
taxpayers seven thousand dollars, (iii) for married filing jointly
taxpayers seven thousand nine hundred fifty dollars, and (iv) for married
filing separately taxpayers three thousand nine hundred seventy-five
dollars. Taxpayers who are allowed additional federal standard deduction
amounts because of age or blindness shall be allowed an increase in the
Nebraska standard deduction for each additional amount allowed on the
federal return. The additional amounts shall be for married taxpayers,
nine hundred fifty dollars, and for single or head of household
taxpayers, one thousand one hundred fifty dollars.
(b) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2007, and before January 1, 2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, every individual who did not itemize deductions on his
or her federal return shall be allowed to subtract from federal adjusted
-3-

LB846 LB846
2026 2026
gross income a standard deduction based on the filing status used on the
federal return. The standard deduction shall be the smaller of the
federal standard deduction actually allowed or (i) for single taxpayers
three thousand dollars and (ii) for head of household taxpayers four
thousand four hundred dollars. The standard deduction for married filing
jointly taxpayers shall be double the standard deduction for single
taxpayers, and for married filing separately taxpayers, the standard
deduction shall be the same as single taxpayers. Taxpayers who are
allowed additional federal standard deduction amounts because of age or
blindness shall be allowed an increase in the Nebraska standard deduction
for each additional amount allowed on the federal return. The additional
amounts shall be for married taxpayers six hundred dollars and for single
or head of household taxpayers seven hundred fifty dollars. The amounts
in this subdivision will be indexed using 1987 as the base year.
(c) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2007, and before January 1, 2018, the standard deduction amounts,
including the additional standard deduction amounts, in this subsection
shall be adjusted for inflation by the method provided in section 151 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed prior to December 22,
2017. If any amount is not a multiple of fifty dollars, the amount shall
be rounded to the next lowest multiple of fifty dollars.
(3)(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2018, every individual who did not itemize deductions on his
or her federal return shall be allowed to subtract from federal adjusted
gross income a standard deduction based on the filing status used on the
federal return. The standard deduction shall be the smaller of the
federal standard deduction actually allowed or (i) six thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars for single taxpayers and (ii) nine thousand nine
hundred dollars for head of household taxpayers. The standard deduction
for married filing jointly taxpayers or qualifying widows or widowers
shall be double the standard deduction for single taxpayers, and the
-4-

LB846 LB846
2026 2026
standard deduction for married filing separately taxpayers shall be the
same as the standard deduction for single taxpayers. Taxpayers who are
allowed additional federal standard deduction amounts because of age or
blindness shall be allowed an increase in the Nebraska standard deduction
for each additional amount allowed on the federal return. The additional
amounts shall be one thousand three hundred dollars for married taxpayers
and one thousand six hundred dollars for single or head of household
taxpayers.
(b) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2019, the standard deduction amounts, including the additional
standard deduction amounts, in this subsection shall be adjusted for
inflation based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics
from the twelve months ending on August 31, 2017, to the twelve months
ending on August 31 of the year preceding the taxable year. If any amount
is not a multiple of fifty dollars, the amount shall be rounded to the
next lowest multiple of fifty dollars.
(4)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January
1, 2026, every (4) Every individual who itemized deductions on his or her
federal return shall be allowed to subtract from federal adjusted gross
income the greater of either the standard deduction allowed in this
section or his or her federal itemized deductions as defined in section
63(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except for the
amount for state or local income taxes included in federal itemized
deductions before any federal disallowance.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, every individual who itemized deductions on his or her
federal return shall be allowed to subtract from federal adjusted gross
income the greater of either the standard deduction allowed in this
section or his or her federal itemized deductions as defined in section
63(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except for the
-5-

LB846 LB846
2026 2026
amount for state or local income taxes included in federal itemized
deductions not exceeding the applicable limitation amount set for taxable
years beginning after calendar year 2029 under section 164(b)(7) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as such section existed on January 1,
2026.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-2716.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-